Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1594.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 180.810 is amended to read:
180.810. (1) The Attorney General shall publish model policies intended to limit, to the fullest
extent possible consistent with state and federal law, immigration enforcement at public schools,
public health facilities, courthouses, public shelters and other public facilities operated by a public
body.
(2) When the Department of Justice develops, reviews or updates the model policies de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section, the department shall consult with the Office of Im-
migrant and Refugee Advancement.
[(2)] (3) All public bodies are encouraged to implement policies based on the model policies de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section.
[(3)] (4) Any entity that contracts with a public body to provide services related to physical or
mental health, education or access to justice is encouraged to adopt policies based on the model
policies described in subsection (1) of this section.
[(4)] (5) The Attorney General may adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 1a. If Senate Bill 1538 becomes law, section 6, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2026
(Enrolled Senate Bill 1538) (amending ORS 180.810), is repealed and ORS 180.810, as amended
by section 1 of this 2026 Act, is amended to read:
180.810. (1) The Attorney General shall publish model policies intended to limit, to the fullest
extent possible consistent with state and federal law, immigration enforcement at public schools,
public health facilities, courthouses, public shelters and other public facilities operated by a public
body.
(2) When the Department of Justice develops, reviews or updates the model policies described
in subsection (1) of this section, the department shall consult with the Office of Immigrant and
Refugee Advancement.
(3) For the purpose of developing a policy under subsection (1) of this section for public
schools for kindergarten through grade 12:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1594 (SB 1594-B) Page 1

(a) The Attorney General, in addition to consulting with the Office of Immigrant and
Refugee Advancement under subsection (2) of this section, shall consult with organizations
representing school board members and other public school professionals.
(b) In addition to any content of a policy developed under subsection (1) of this section,
a model policy published for public schools for kindergarten through grade 12 must include:
(A) A process for verifying the validity of any warrant or court order involving immi-
gration enforcement;
(B) A requirement that the superintendent of the school district or the education service
district, or the superintendent’s designee, review and approve any response to a law
enforcement request involving immigration enforcement;
(C) Provisions that encourage the superintendent of the school district or the education
service district, or the superintendent’s designee, to consult with legal counsel of the district
or a statewide or regional education organization prior to responding to any immigration
enforcement efforts;
(D) Requirements to ensure compliance with ORS 180.805 and 181A.826; and
(E) Recommendations for how employees of the school district, education service district
or public charter school will respond to immigration enforcement efforts.
(4)(a) All school districts, education service districts and public charter schools must
provide to the employees of the school district, education service district or public charter
school applicable model policies published by the Attorney General under this section.
[(3)] (b) All public bodies to which paragraph (a) of this subsection is not applicable are
encouraged to implement policies based on the model policies described in subsection (1) of this
section.
[(4)] (5) Any entity that contracts with a public body to provide services related to physical or
mental health, education or access to justice is encouraged to adopt policies based on the model
policies described in subsection (1) of this section.
[(5)] (6) The Attorney General may adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 1b. The amendments to ORS 180.810 by section 1a of this 2026 Act become op-
erative on July 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1594 (SB 1594-B) Page 2

Passed by Senate February 24, 2026 Received by Governor:
Repassed by Senate March 4, 2026 ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
..................................................................................
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
Passed by House March 2, 2026
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House ..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1594 (SB 1594-B) Page 3